Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 2. Child Protective Services

Cross references. —

As to privileged communication by a licensed or certified mental health professional, see §

33-38-113

.

Burden of proof in contested hearings. —

Where, in a contested hearing, the department of family services asserts that a child abuse allegation against a parent has been substantiated, the agency has both the initial burden of production and the ultimate burden of persuasion. JM v. Department of Family Servs., 922 P.2d 219,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1996).

In contested hearings under this article, the traditional preponderance-of-the-evidence standard applies. JM v. Department of Family Servs., 922 P.2d 219,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1996).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

The department of family services rule that limits the issues in a contested case hearing to a determination of whether the agency acted in accordance with the law or its own rules does not comply with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, §§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

, because it prevents the department from conducting a full review of the factual issues at the contested hearing. JM v. Department of Family Servs., 922 P.2d 219,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1996).

Physician-patient and psychologist-client privileges limited by this article. —

Because of the overriding importance that the state attaches to halting and preventing child abuse, privileges created between physician-patient and psychologist-client by §§

1-12-101

and 33-27-103 (now

33-27-123

) are limited by the subsequent enactment of this article, which sets forth a procedure for ascertaining and correcting child abuse and neglect. In re Parental Rights of PP, 648 P.2d 512,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 355

(Wyo. 1982), overruled, Clark v. Alexander, 953 P.2d 145,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1998).

Applied

in

In re Parental Rights of PP, 648 P.2d 512,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 355

(Wyo. 1982).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Family Violence Protection Act: A New Remedy for an Old Problem,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 691 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Tort liability of public authority for failure to remove parentally abused or neglected children from parents' custody, 60 ALR4th 942.

Denial or restriction of visitation rights to parent charged with sexually abusing child, 1 ALR5th 776.

Failure of state or local government entity to protect child abuse victim as violation of federal constitutional right, 79 ALR Fed 514.

Physical examination of child's body for evidence of abuse as violative of fourth amendment or as raising fourth amendment issue, 93 ALR Fed 530.

§ 14-3-201.
Purpose.

The purpose of W.S.

14-3-201

through

14-3-216

is to delineate the responsibilities of the state agency, other governmental agencies or officials, professionals and citizens to intervene on behalf of a child suspected of being abused or neglected, to protect the best interest of the child, to further offer protective services when necessary in order to prevent any harm to the child or any other children living in the home, to protect children from abuse or neglect which jeopardize their health or welfare, to stabilize the home environment, to preserve family life whenever possible and to provide permanency for the child in appropriate circumstances. The child’s health, safety and welfare shall be of paramount concern in implementing and enforcing this article.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 220, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 14-21; Laws 1977, ch. 110, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 14-2-105; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1995, ch. 136, § 1; 2005, ch. 236, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section, which read: “The purpose of W.S.

14-3-201

through

14-3-215

is to protect the best interest of the child or a disabled adult, to further offer protective services when necessary in order to prevent any harm to the child or any other children living in the home or to a disabled adult, to protect children or disabled adults from abuse or neglect which jeopardize their health or welfare, to stabilize the home environment and to preserve family life whenever possible.”

Grandparents' motion denied.—

Juvenile court
did not make an unreasonable decision in denying the grandparents'
motion seeking to transfer placement of their grandchild from the
foster parents to the grandparents; the child had been in the foster
parents' care approximately two and a half years, testimony indicated
that changing placement could be detrimental to her, the juvenile
court correctly concluded that the best interests of the child were
paramount, and the juvenile court's reasoning was in accord with the
statute governing permanency hearings. PM v. State (In the Interest of SO), 2016 WY 99, 382 P.3d 51,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 2016).

Quoted

in

JM v. Department of Family Servs., 922 P.2d 219,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1996); Johnson v. State, 922 P.2d 1384,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1996).

Stated

in

Michael v. Hertzler, 900 P.2d 1144,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1995).

Cited

in

City of Laramie v. Hysong, 808 P.2d 199,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1991); RM v. State (In re JM), 2014 WY 114,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Sept. 16, 2014).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Evidence — Child Abuse and the Medical Diagnosis or Treatment Exception to the Hearsay Rule. Goldade v. State, 674 P.2d 721,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 396

(Wyo. 1983),” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 735 (1985).

§ 14-3-202.
Definitions.

As used in W.S.

14-3-201

through

14-3-216

:

“A person responsible for a child’s welfare” includes the child’s parent, noncustodial parent, guardian, custodian, stepparent, foster parent or other person, institution or agency having the physical custody or control of the child;

“Abuse” means inflicting or causing physical or mental injury, harm or imminent danger to the physical or mental health or welfare of a child other than by accidental means, including abandonment, unless the abandonment is a relinquishment substantially in accordance with W.S.

14-11-101

through

14-11-109

, excessive or unreasonable corporal punishment, malnutrition or substantial risk thereof by reason of intentional or unintentional neglect, and the commission or allowing the commission of a sexual offense against a child as defined by law:

“Mental injury” means an injury to the psychological capacity or emotional stability of a child as evidenced by an observable or substantial impairment in his ability to function within a normal range of performance and behavior with due regard to his culture;

“Physical injury” means any harm to a child including but not limited to disfigurement, impairment of any bodily organ, skin bruising if greater in magnitude than minor bruising associated with reasonable corporal punishment, bleeding, burns, fracture of any bone, subdural hematoma or substantial malnutrition;

“Substantial risk” means a strong possibility as contrasted with a remote or insignificant possibility;

“Imminent danger” includes threatened harm and means a statement, overt act, condition or status which represents an immediate and substantial risk of sexual abuse or physical or mental injury. “Imminent danger” includes violation of W.S. 31-5-233(m).

“Child” means any person under the age of eighteen (18);

“Child protective agency” means the field or regional offices of the department of family services;

“Court proceedings” means child protective proceedings which have as their purpose the protection of a child through an adjudication of whether the child is abused or neglected, and the making of an appropriate order of disposition;

“Institutional child abuse and neglect” means situations of child abuse or neglect where a foster home or other public or private residential home, institution or agency is responsible for the child’s welfare;

“Neglect” means a failure or refusal by those responsible for the child’s welfare to provide adequate care, maintenance, supervision, education or medical, surgical or any other care necessary for the child’s well being. “Neglect” for purposes of “education” as used in this paragraph includes willful absenteeism as defined in W.S. 21-4-101(a)(vii). Treatment given in good faith by spiritual means alone, through prayer, by a duly accredited practitioner in accordance with the tenets and practices of a recognized church or religious denomination is not child neglect for that reason alone;

“State agency” means the state department of family services;

“Subject of the report” means any child reported under W.S.

14-3-201

through

14-3-216

or the child’s parent, guardian or other person responsible for the child’s welfare;

“Unsubstantiated report” means any report made pursuant to W.S. 14-3-201 through 14-3-216 that, upon investigation, is not supported by a preponderance of the evidence;

“Substantiated report” means any report of child abuse or neglect made pursuant to W.S. 14-3-201 through 14-3-216 that, upon investigation, is supported by a preponderance of the evidence;

through (xiv) Repealed by Laws 2002, ch. 86, § 3.

“Collaborative” means the interagency children’s collaborative created by W.S.

14-3-215

;

“Department” means the state department of family services and its local offices;

“Transportation” means the provision of a means to convey the child from one place to another by the custodian or someone acting on his behalf in the performance of required duties, but does not require the state to provide incidental travel or to purchase a motor vehicle for the child’s own use to travel.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 181, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 14-28.7; Laws 1977, ch. 110, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 14-2-113; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1983, ch. 146, § 1; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 1993, ch. 1, § 1; ch. 44, § 1; 1994, ch. 39, § 1; 1995, ch. 136, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 86, §§ 2, 3; ch. 89, § 1; 2003, ch. 167, § 2; 2005, ch. 23, § 1; ch. 236, § 2; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2007, ch. 72, § 1; 2022 ch. 4, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to sexual offenses against children, see chapter 4 of title 6.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, in (a)(x) substituted “Unsubstantiated” for “Unfounded,” in (a)(x) and (a)(xi) inserted provisions requiring investigation and changed the standard of evidence from credible to a preponderance, and made stylistic changes.

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 236, § 2, effective July 1, 2005, substituted “14-3-216” for “14-3-215” in (a), (a)(x) and (a)(xi); added (a)(xv), (a)(xvi), (a)(xvii); and made a stylistic change.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2006 amendment,

in (a), substituted “14-3-216” for “14-3-215.”

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(ii)(D), added the last sentence referring to “Imminent danger.”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added the second sentence in (a)(vii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3 provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Sufficient evidence of abuse.

Evidence was
sufficient to support defendants’ convictions for physically
abusing the victim because the victim testified that defendant would
sometimes use the black belt as punishment if the victim did not complete
his chores, the belt would leave bruises on his bottom, back, and
legs, and his three siblings testified that both defendants used a
backscratcher to beat the victim. Larkins v. State, 2018 WY 122, 429 P.3d 28,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 2018).

Evidence was
sufficient to support defendant’s conviction of mentally abusing
two victims because one victim was diagnosed with PTSD and a counselor
and a physician attributed the victims’ mental illnesses, in
part, to the abuse they suffered and witnessed by defendants. Larkins v. State, 2018 WY 122, 429 P.3d 28,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 2018).

In a felony
child abuse case, a district court erred when it failed to instruct
the jury in the elements instruction of the count relating to the
victim that physical injury excluded “reasonable corporal punishment”;
the error was plain because the instructions were confusing as to
the burden of proof. However, the State was entitled to retry defendant
because it presented sufficient evidence to support a verdict finding
that the victim's physical injuries due to getting hit in the ribs
and slapped in the face were not the result of reasonable corporal
punishment. Andersen v. State, 2014 WY 88, 330 P.3d 256,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 2014).

Trial court did not abuse its discretion by denying a motion for judgment of acquittal because the evidence was sufficient to support a conviction for felony child abuse; defendant used wood to spank the victim, which left abrasions, bruises, and lacerations. Defendant's argument that the injuries were not serious and that he acted reasonably was misplaced; because the State was entitled to all favorable inferences that could have been drawn from the evidence, the jury was free to reject defendant's proffered justifications for the abuse. Swan v. State, 2014 WY 38, 320 P.3d 235,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 2014).

“Sexual contact,” as defined by sexual assault provisions, amounts to “abuse.” —

“Sexual contact,” as defined by § 6-2-301(a)(vi) (sexual assault — definitions), obviously poses a serious danger to the physical and mental well-being of a child and amounts to “abuse” within the meaning of subsection (a)(ii) of this section. In re Matter of GP, 679 P.2d 976,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 269

(Wyo. 1984).

Whether injuries accidental or deliberate important factor in ascertaining child abuse. —

In ascertaining whether a child has been a victim of abuse, it is important to discover whether the injuries sustained by the child were accidental or deliberate. Goldade v. State, 674 P.2d 721,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 396

(Wyo. 1983), cert. denied, 467 U.S. 1253, 104 S. Ct. 3539, 82 L. Ed. 2d 844, 1984 U.S. LEXIS 2707 (U.S. 1984).

Malnutrition. —

Severe and substantial malnutrition resulting from mother's conscious disregard was sufficient to support conviction for felony child abuse. DeWitt v. State, 917 P.2d 1144,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 1996).

Neglect. —

In a termination of parental rights case, it was reasonable to conclude that the developmental deficiencies displayed by a child were the result of neglect by his parents; social workers never saw the parents interact with the child, the house was so cluttered and filthy that the child could not roll over if placed on the floor, the child was constantly observed in his stroller, and at the age of one, the child could not hold up his own head, could not crawl, could not talk, and did not know how to use his fingers. SD v. Carbon County Dep't of Family Servs. (In re SED), 2002 WY 168, 57 P.3d 1235,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 195

(Wyo. 2002).

It was no error to adjudicate a noncustodial father neglectful because Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 14-3-202(a)(i) did not require a parent to have physical custody of a child to be defined as “a person responsible for a child's welfare,” as prior to the use of the first “or” in the statute, the legislature listed categories of individuals who, by fitting into one of those categories, inherently were responsible for a child's welfare whether the child was in their custody or not, as long as a noncustodial parent had knowledge and an opportunity to act and failed or refused to do so, and categories listed after the “or” were broad and had no inherent responsibility towards a child, so the legislature modified those falling into that category by requiring physical custody or control of the child. TW v. State (In re JB), 2017 WY 26, 390 P.3d 357,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2017).

In order for a noncustodial parent—whether he or she lives in a different town, state, or country voluntarily, due to military deployment, or any other reason—to be deemed neglectful of a child, the State must prove that he or she had the knowledge and opportunity to act and he or she failed or refused to do so. TW v. State (In re JB), 2017 WY 26, 390 P.3d 357,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2017).

Evidence was sufficient to support the trial court's finding of neglect based on the mother's unsanitary and unkempt home because it showed that: (1) the children's food was rotten, and that it came from the dumpsters of nearby grocery stores; (2) there were bloodied cloth rags strewn
about the upstairs bathroom; (3) there was a foul smell throughout the house; (4) one child's room lacked an apparent heat source and was cold; (5) water leaked from the bathroom into the child's room; (6) dog and cat feces remained on the floors without being cleaned up; and (7) trash and dirty laundry was scattered around the house.
DL v. State (In re MC), 2013 WY 43, 299 P.3d 75,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2013).

Evidence was
sufficient to support the neglect finding based on the mother's use
of and availability of marijuana because the trial court could have
reasonably concluded that it was neglectful to expose a 12-year-old
child to the use of marijuana to the extent that he was knowledgeable
as to its effects and was able to find it in the home. DL v. State (In re MC), 2013 WY 43, 299 P.3d 75,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2013).

“Substantiated report.” —

Subsection (a)(xi) suggests that an abuse report has been substantiated when an investigation reveals that credible evidence exists to support the allegations. JM v. Department of Family Servs., 922 P.2d 219,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1996) (decided prior to 2005 amendment).

Sufficient evidence of abuse. —

Trial court had before it sufficient evidence to show that children had been abused under
Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 14-3-202(a)(ii)(B); the children's statements to a detective, as well as photographs, indicated that they were bitten by the mother's boyfriend.
SC v. State (In re NC), 2013 WY 2, 294 P.3d 866,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 2013).

Imminent risk of physical injury. —

Jury could reasonably conclude that placing an eight-month-old baby in a fleece bag and tying it shut placed the child in imminent risk of physical injury under Wyo. Stat. §§ 14-3-202(a)(ii) and (vii),

14-2-309

.
In re Cs v. Johnson County Dep't of Family Servs., 2006 WY 130, 143 P.3d 918,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(2006).

Parental rights terminated due to domestic violence and other issues. —

Court properly terminated a father's parental rights where the child was subjected to domestic violence, and where the father failed to follow the case plan, failed to obtain consistent and adequate housing, and failed to visit the child as often as allowed. RS v. Dept. of Family Servs. (In re KLS), 2004 WY 87, 94 P.3d 1025,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2004).

Substantial evidence existed to support the Department's finding,

where it found that the available facts, when viewed in light of surrounding circumstances, would cause a reasonable person to believe that the child was abused or neglected. RM v. Department of Family Servs.(In re Fair Hearing Request), 953 P.2d 477,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1998).

In parental-rights-termination proceeding, instructions as to low socioeconomic standing and slovenliness properly refused. —

In a proceeding to terminate parental rights on the grounds of neglect, instructions proffered by the mother stating that parental rights cannot be terminated on the basis that the natural parents, because of low social or economic standing, cannot provide their children with all the advantages that more affluent, better educated foster parents could provide, and stating that parental rights may not be terminated solely on the grounds of slovenliness, were properly refused. MS v. Kuchera, 682 P.2d 982,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 290

(Wyo. 1984).

Mental injury.—

Defendants did not dispute at their trial for multiple counts of child abuse that their children suffered mental injury because each of their children was found to have significant deficits in their social and behavioral development and two of their children were diagnosed with attention deficit disorders. Gifford v. State, 2017 WY 93, 399 P.3d 1240,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 2017).

Opinion evidence concerning abuse. —

Witness could offer his opinions concerning the children's abuse as a lay witness under Wyo. R. Evid. 701 because he did not testify that visits with the mother were abuse under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 14-3-202(a)(ii), but merely intended to convey his opinion that the intermittent nature of their visits with the mother was causing problems for the children in adjusting to their lives without their mother.
M.L. v. Laramie County Dep't of Family Servs. (In the Interest of L.L.), 2007 WY 92, 159 P.3d 499,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 2007).

Applied

in

DS v. Department of Pub. Assistance & Social Servs., 607 P.2d 911,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 245

(Wyo. 1980); In re Child X, 617 P.2d 1078,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 308

(Wyo. 1980); In re SKJ, 673 P.2d 640,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 399

(Wyo. 1983).

Quoted

in

In re Parental Rights of PP, 648 P.2d 512,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 355

(Wyo. 1982); Keser v. State, 706 P.2d 263,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 553

(Wyo. 1985); Campbell v. State, 709 P.2d 425,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 608

(Wyo. 1985); TR v. Washakie County Dep't of Pub. Assistance & Social Servs., 736 P.2d 712,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 431

(Wyo. 1987); Johnson v. State, 922 P.2d 1384,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1996); Jo v. State, Dep't of Family Servs. (in the Interest of Re), 2011 WY 170, 267 P.3d 1092,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Dec. 28, 2011).

Cited

in

RS v. Johnson County Dept. of Family Servs. (In re JL), 989 P.2d 1268,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1999); MN v. Dept' of Family Servs. (In the Interest of MN), 2003 WY 135, 78 P.3d 232,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 2003).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Child Protection: A Suggested Role for Members of the Wyoming State Bar,” see IX Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1974).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For comment, “Fetal Equality?: The Equality State's Response to the Challenge of Protecting Unborn Children,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 193 (1997).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

§ 14-3-203.
Duties of state agency; on-call services.

The state agency shall:

Administer W.S.

14-3-201

through

14-3-215

;

Be responsible for strengthening and improving state and community efforts toward the prevention, identification and treatment of child abuse and neglect in the state; and

Refer any person or family seeking assistance in meeting child care responsibilities, whether or not the problem presented by the person or family is child abuse or neglect, to appropriate community resources, agencies, services or facilities.

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 236, § 4.

The state agency may contract for assistance in providing on-call services. The assistance may include screening protection calls, making appropriate referrals to law enforcement and the agency, and maintaining a record of calls and referrals. Contractors shall have training in child protection services.

The state agency shall ensure that all child protective service workers are trained:

In the principles of family centered practice that focus on providing services to the entire family to achieve the goals of safety and permanency for children, including balancing the best interests of children with the rights of parents;

In the duty of the workers to inform the individual subject to a child abuse or neglect allegation, at the earliest opportunity during the initial contact, of the specific complaints or allegations made against the individual;

Concerning constitutional and statutory rights of children and families from and after the initial time of contact and the worker’s legal duty not to violate the constitutional and statutory rights of children and families from and after the initial time of contact;

To know the state’s legal definitions of physical abuse, sexual abuse, neglect, dependency and endangerment;

To know the provisions of federal and state laws governing child welfare practice, including but not limited to the Adoption and Safe Families Act, Indian Child Welfare Act, Multi-Ethnic Placement Act, the Child Abuse Prevention Treatment Act and the Family First Prevention Services Act, as amended;

To make reasonable efforts to determine if the person responsible for the welfare of a child in a suspected case of child abuse or neglect is a member of the armed forces or if the child is enrolled in the defense enrollment eligibility reporting system of the United States department of defense.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 110, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 14-2-114; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1989, ch. 125, § 1; 2005, ch. 236, §§ 2, 4; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2017 ch. 3, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 143, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, repealed former (a)(iv) relating to diagnosis and referral for treatment of osteogenesis imperfecta and hemophilia; and added (c).

The 2006 amendment,

in (a), inserted “and” at the end of (ii); and made a related change in (iii).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, added (c)(vi).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (c)(v), added “and the Family First Prevention Services Act” and made related changes.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3 provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Stated

in

RM v. Department of Family Servs., 953 P.2d 477,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1998).

Federal Law. —

The Adoption and Safe Families Act is PL 105-89 and is codified primarily in 42 U.S.C.S. § 629 et seq. The Indian Child Welfare Act is codified as 29 U.S.C.S. § 1901 et seq. The Multi-Ethnic Placement Act is PL 103-382, which was codified as 42 U.S.C.S. § 5115a et seq. before being repealed. Similar provisions are at 42 U.S.C.S. § 1996b. The Child Abuse Prevention and Treatment Act is codified as 42 U.S.C.S. § 5101 et seq.

§ 14-3-204.
Duties of local child protective agency.

The local child protective agency shall:

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 179, § 2.

Receive, assess, investigate or arrange for investigation and coordinate investigation or assessment of all reports of known or suspected child abuse or neglect;

Within twenty-four (24) hours after notification of a suspected case of child abuse or neglect, initiate an investigation or assessment to verify every report. The representative of the child protective agency shall, at the initial time of contact with the individual subject to a child abuse and neglect investigation or assessment, advise the individual of the specific complaints or allegations made against the individual. A thorough investigation or assessment and report of child abuse or neglect shall be made in the manner and time prescribed by the state agency pursuant to rules and regulations adopted in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. If the child protective agency is denied reasonable access to a child by a parent or other persons and the agency deems that the best interest of the child so requires, it shall seek an appropriate court order by ex parte proceedings or other appropriate proceedings to see the child. The child protective agency shall assign a report:

For investigation when allegations contained in the report indicate:

That criminal charges could be filed, the child appears to be in imminent danger and it is likely the child will need to be removed from the home; or

A child fatality, major injury or sexual abuse has occurred.

For assessment when the report does not meet the criteria of subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.

If the investigation or assessment discloses that abuse or neglect is present, initiate services with the family of the abused or neglected child to assist in resolving problems that lead to or caused the child abuse or neglect;

If the child protective agency is able through investigation to substantiate a case of abuse or neglect, it shall notify the person suspected of causing the abuse or neglect by first class mail to his last known address of his right to request a hearing on the agency’s determination for a final determination before the office of administrative hearings pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act;

Make reasonable efforts to contact the noncustodial parent of the child and inform the parent of substantiated abuse or neglect in high risk or moderate risk cases as determined pursuant to rules and regulations of the state agency and inform the parent of any proposed action to be taken;

Cooperate, coordinate and assist with the prosecution and law enforcement agencies;

When the best interest of the child requires court action, contact the county and prosecuting attorney to initiate legal proceedings and assist the county and prosecuting attorney during the proceedings. If the county attorney elects not to bring court action the local child protective agency may petition the court for appointment of a guardian ad litem who shall act in the best interest of the child and who may petition the court to direct the county attorney to show cause why an action should not be commenced under W.S.

14-3-401

through

14-3-439

;

Refer a child receiving department services who is under the age of six (6) years to the department of health, division of developmental disabilities preschool program for educational and developmental screening and assessment; and

Make reasonable efforts to determine if the person responsible for the welfare of a child in a suspected case of child abuse or neglect is a member of the armed forces or if the child is enrolled in the defense enrollment eligibility reporting system of the United States department of defense.

The local child protective agency may appeal an adverse determination of the office of administrative hearings.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 110, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 14-28.7:2; W.S. 1977, § 14-2-115; Laws 1978, ch. 25, § 1; 1993, ch. 44, § 1; 1997, ch. 199, § 2; 2005, ch. 236, § 2; 2009, ch. 127, § 1; 2013 ch. 142, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2017 ch. 3, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 179, § 2, effective March 6, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, inserted provisions for assessment throughout; rewrote (a)(iii), adding the second and last sentences including (a)(iii)(A) and (a)(iii)(B) and adding provisions that investigation and assessments or reports should be made in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act; added (a)(v), redesignating former (a)(v) through (a)(vii) as (a)(vi) through (a)(viii); and added (a)(ix).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, inserted “by first class mail to his last known address” and “on the agency's determination for a final determination before the office of administrative hearings” in (a)(v); and added (b).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “assessment to verify every report” for “assessment and verification of every report” in the first sentence in (a)(iii).

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 3, §
1, effective July 1, 2017, added (a)(x), and made related changes.

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 179, § 2, deleted (a)(i).
Laws 2017, ch. 179, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Feb. 17, 2017.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

State not required to show reasonable efforts to reunify where abuse and neglect not at issue. —

State was not required to show reasonable efforts to reunify the family in a parental rights termination proceeding where there was no requirement for reasonable efforts because the termination was sought on the basis that the children were left in the care of another for at least a year under and had been in foster care with the state for over fifteen of the last twenty-months. SLJ v. Dep't of Family Servs.(In re SJJ), 2005 WY 3, 104 P.3d 74,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 2005).

Order changing a mother’s permanency plan from family reunification to termination of her rights and adoption was reversed because the record established that the Wyoming Department of Family Services failed to prove by a preponderance of the evidence that it made reasonable efforts to reunify the mother with the children. JR v. State (In the Int. of MA), 2022 WY 29, 505 P.3d 179,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2022).

Cited

in

Gale v. State, 792 P.2d 570,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1990); City of Laramie v. Hysong, 808 P.2d 199,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1991); DH v. Wyo. Dep't of Family Servs. (In re “H” Children), 2003 WY 155, 79 P.3d 997,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 2003).

Quoted in

RM v. State (In re JM), 2014 WY 114,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Sept. 16, 2014).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Attorney for Child Versus Guardian Ad Litem: Wyoming Creates a Hybrid, but is it a Formula for Malpractice?,” see XXXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 381 (1999).